Alaska statutes. Title 8. Business and Professions.
Article 4. Dental Assistants.

Sec. 08.36.342.
Coronal polishing certificate.

The board shall issue a coronal polishing certificate to a dental assistant if the dental assistant furnishes evidence satisfactory to the board that the dental assistant has completed a program of instruction approved by the board.

A certificate issued under (a) of this section authorizes a dental assistant under the direct supervision of a dentist licensed in the state to perform coronal polishing on teeth without calculus.

The board may by regulation establish fees, renewal, and continuing education requirements for a certificate issued under this section.

History.

(§ 6 ch 111 SLA 2008)

Sec. 08.36.344.
Restorative function certificate.

The board shall issue a restorative function certificate to a dental assistant if the dental assistant furnishes evidence satisfactory to the board that the dental assistant has

successfully completed a course offered by or under the auspices of a program accredited by the Commission on Dental Accreditation of the American Dental Association or other equivalent course or program approved by the board; and

passed the Western Regional Examining Board’s restorative examination or other equivalent examination approved by the board within the five years preceding the dental assistant’s certificate application, or the dental assistant has legal authorization from another state or jurisdiction to perform restorative functions.

A certificate issued under this section authorizes a dental assistant under the direct supervision of a licensed dentist to place restorations into a cavity prepared by the licensed dentist and thereafter carve, contour, and adjust contacts and occlusion of the restoration.

The board may by regulation establish fees, renewal, and continuing education requirements for a certificate under this section.

History.

(§ 6 ch 111 SLA 2008; am § 35 ch 53 SLA 2012)

Sec. 08.36.346.
Delegation to dental assistants.

Except as otherwise provided in this chapter, a dentist licensed in this state may delegate to a dental assistant under indirect supervision

the exposure and development of radiographs;

application of topical preventive agents or pit and fissure sealants; and

other dental operations and services except

those that may be performed by a dental hygienist under AS

08.32.110(a)

; and

those that may not be delegated to a dental hygienist under AS

08.32.110(c)

.

A dentist licensed in this state may delegate to a dental assistant under direct supervision

coronal polishing on teeth without calculus, if the dental assistant is certified under AS

08.36.342

;

the placement of a restoration into a cavity prepared by a dentist licensed under this chapter and the subsequent carving, contouring, and adjustment of the contacts and occlusion of the restoration, if the dental assistant is certified under AS

08.36.344

; and

other dental operations and services as defined and regulated by the board; however, a dentist may not delegate to a dental assistant a dental operation or service that requires the professional skill of a licensed dentist or licensed dental hygienist, including those dental operations and services specified in AS

08.32.110(c)

.

History.

(§ 6 ch 111 SLA 2008)

Sec. 08.36.347.
Exemption from registration requirement.

A person enrolled in a program or course of study may perform dental assisting procedures as part of that program or course of study without a registration document if the procedures are performed

under the direct supervision of a member of the faculty who is licensed under this chapter or AS 08.32; and

as part of a clinical program that has received written approval from the board.

A person performing dental assisting procedures under (a) of this section is subject to all other provisions of this chapter and statutes and regulations that apply to the practice of dental assisting by a registered dental assistant.

History.

(§ 36 ch 53 SLA 2012)

Sec. 08.36.349.
Definitions.

In AS

08.36.342

—

08.36.349

,

“direct supervision” means a dentist licensed in this state is in the dental office, personally diagnoses the condition to be treated, personally authorizes the procedure, and, before dismissal of the patient, evaluates the performance of the dental assistant;

“indirect supervision” means a dentist licensed in this state is in the dental office, authorizes the procedures, and remains in the dental office while the procedures are being performed by the dental assistant.

History.

(§ 6 ch 111 SLA 2008)